Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB134.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 314.142 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Nursing shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to
create a Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner Program. These administrative regulations shall address, at a
minimum:
(a) Educational requirements for sexual assault nurse examiners and statewide standards for provision of
the education;
(b) The application process through which registered nurses who submit documentation of required
education and clinical experience and who remit the designated application fee may apply to the board
to be credentialed as a "Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner";
(c) Continuing education requirements for maintenance of the sexual assault nurse examiner credential;
(d) Methods of monitoring overall program implementation; and
(e) Procedures for obtaining input from the Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee
established under KRS Chapter 403 prior to proposing amendments to any provision of the
administrative regulations promulgated under this section or KRS 314.131.
(2) Any person in this state who holds a credential as a Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner as defined in KRS
314.011(14) shall have the right to use the title "Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner" and the abbreviation
"SANE". No other person shall assume the title or use the abbreviation or any other words, letters, signs, or
figures to indicate that the person using the same is a Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner.
(3) The board shall employ a health professional as a statewide sexual assault nurse examiner (SANE)
coordinator to support the logistical operations of the SANE Program and individual SANEs credentialed
under this section.
(4) The board shall establish a description, essential duties, and responsibilities of the SANE coordinator
position that shall include but not be limited to:
(a) Identifying and recruiting potential SANEs across the state;
(b) Organizing and facilitating comprehensive SANE training programs;
(c) Establishing and maintaining relationships with key stakeholders such as hospitals, law enforcement
agencies, rape crisis advocates, and others; and
(d) Increasing SANE Program collaboration by creating opportunities for networking and building
rapport among SANE training programs.
(5) The board shall collaborate with the Kentucky Hospital Association, the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services, the Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee, and any other entities deemed
appropriate by the board, to develop a statewide strategic plan that utilizes a regional model to ensure
SANE coverage for all Kentucky hospitals. The strategic plan shall be submitted to the Legislative Research
Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services by December 1, 2026.
(6) The board shall develop a state registry of SANEs and make it accessible from the board's website by
registered SANEs and Kentucky hospitals. The registry shall be operational by December 1, 2026.
(7) The board shall notify each newly registered SANE that the state registry of SANEs is available on the
board's website as required in subsection (6) of this section.
Section 2. KRS 403.707 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee is established.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) The Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee shall be co-chaired by the chief executive
officer[director] of the Kentucky Association of Sexual Assault Programs or the chief executive officer's
designee and the commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police or the commissioner's designee.
(3) The membership of the Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee shall consist of the following:
(a) The executive director of the Kentucky Board of Nursing or the executive director's designee;
(b) The executive director of the Kentucky Nurses Association or the executive director's designee;
(c) The executive director of the Kentucky Hospital Association or the executive director's designee;
(d) The chief executive officer[director] of the Children's Advocacy Centers of Kentucky or the chief
executive officer's designee[Kentucky Association of Children's Advocacy Centers];
(e) The director of the Department of Kentucky State Police Crime Lab or the director's designee;
(f) The commissioner of the Department for Community Based Services or the commissioner's designee;
(g) The director of the Office of Victims Advocacy in the Office of the Attorney General or the director's
designee;
(h) A sexual assault nurse examiner appointed by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services;
(i) A representative from a sexual assault response team appointed by the chief executive officer[director]
of the Kentucky Association of Sexual Assault Programs;
(j) A physician appointed by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services; and
(k) A Commonwealth's attorney or an assistant Commonwealth's attorney appointed by the Attorney
General.
(4) Members appointed under subsection (3)(h) to (k) of this section shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing
authority and shall not serve longer than four (4) years without reappointment.
(5) The Sexual Assault Response Team Advisory Committee shall:
(a) Serve in an advisory capacity to the Kentucky Board of Nursing in accomplishing the duties set forth
under KRS 314.142;
(b) Serve in an advisory capacity to the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet in the development of the
statewide sexual assault protocol required under KRS 216B.400(5);
(c) Develop a model protocol for the operation of sexual assault response teams which shall include the
roles of sexual assault nurse examiners, physicians, law enforcement, prosecutors, and victim
advocates;
(d) Provide assistance to each regional rape crisis center, as designated by the Cabinet for Health and
Family Services, in establishing a regional sexual assault response team;
(e) Develop model policies for law enforcement agencies related to handling sexual assault examination
kits and investigating sexual assaults with a victim-centered, evidence-based approach;
(f) [By January 1, 2018, report to the General Assembly on the results of the analysis of previously
untested sexual assault examination kits submitted to the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic
laboratory pursuant to 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 58, sec. 1, including whether analysis of those kits led to the
identification and prosecution of suspects and the cost to society of the offenses committed by the
suspects identified;
(g) ]By July 1 of each year[, 2018, and by each July 1 thereafter], report to the General Assembly and to
the secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet on the number of sexual assaults reported, the
number of sexual assault examination kits submitted to the Department of Kentucky State Police
forensic laboratory, the number of kits tested, and the number of charges filed and convictions obtained
in sexual assault cases in the previous calendar year;
(g)[(h)] Provide information and recommendations concerning the activities of the agency or
organization represented by each individual committee member as related to sexual assault issues and
programs within the purview of the agency or organization; and

CHAPTER 66 3
(h)[(i)] Recommend to the appropriate state agency any changes in statute, administrative regulation,
training, policy, and budget to promote a multidisciplinary response to sexual assault.
Signed by Governor April 10, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version